fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-niska_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - niska - ok : # -m animate noun, goose AEW NA4
     niska+N+A+Sg: niska
     niska+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: niniskim
     niska+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kiniskim
     niska+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: niniskiminân
     niska+N+A+Px21Pl+Sg: kiniskiminaw
     niska+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kiniskimiwâw

     niska+N+A+Pl: niskak
     niska+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: niniskimak
     niska+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kiniskimak
     niska+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: niniskiminânak
     niska+N+A+Px21Pl+Pl: kiniskiminawak
     niska+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kiniskimiwâwak
     
     niska+N+A+Obv: niska
     niska+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: niniskima
     niska+N+A+Px2Sg+Obv: kiniskima
     niska+N+A+Px1Pl+Obv: niniskiminâna
     niska+N+A+Px21Pl+Obv: kiniskiminawa
     niska+N+A+Px2Pl+Obv: kiniskimiwâwa
     niska+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: oniskima
     niska+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: oniskimiwâwa
     niska+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: oniskimiyiwa
     
     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [niskis, niskisis]
     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [niniskimis, niniskimisis]
     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kiniskimis, kiniskimisis]
     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [niniskimisinân, niniskimisisinân]
     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px21Pl+Sg: [kiniskimisinaw, kiniskimisisinaw]
     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kiniskimisiwâw, kiniskimisisiwâw]

     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [niskisak, niskisisak]
     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [niniskimisak, niniskimisisak]
     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kiniskimisak, kiniskimisisak]
     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [niniskimisinânak, niniskimisisinânak]
     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px21Pl+Pl: [kiniskimisinawak, kiniskimisisinawak]
     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kiniskimisiwâwak, kiniskimisisiwâwak]
     
     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: [oniskimisa, oniskimisisa]
     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: [oniskimisiwâwa, oniskimisisiwâwa]
     niska+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [oniskimisiyiwa, oniskimisisiyiwa]
